California, session 20252026, AB1684.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4738 is added to the Civil Code, to read:4738. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any provision of the governing documents, architectural guidelines, or policies shall be void and unenforceable if the provision prohibits or restricts the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system that complies with all applicable state and local building codes.(b) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property, that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system is void and unenforceable.(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), an association shall not prohibit or restrict a member from installing, upgrading, replacing, or using a cooling system in the member’s separate interest. The association shall not do any of the following:(A) Charge any fee to a member in connection with the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system.(B) Require a member to use a specific cooling system, type of cooling system, or cooling system contractor or product.(C) Claim to receive any rebate, credit, or commission in connection with a member’s installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system.(D) Require a member to remove a cooling system or prevent the replacement or upgrade of an existing cooling system.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the association establishes either of the following:(A) The installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of the cooling system would violate federal, state, or local law.(B) (i) A permit from a designated permitting authority is required for the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of the cooling system, and that permit is not granted.(ii) For purposes of this section, “permit” shall include any electrical, building, or other permit required by law for work associated with the cooling system.(d) For purposes of this section, “cooling system” may include, but is not limited to, a portable air-conditioning unit, a window air-conditioning unit, a swamp cooler or any evaporative cooler, a cooling fan system, a heat pump, or any other technology that reasonably creates an internal temperature cooling benefit. A cooling system shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by law.(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the ability of an association to require a member whose installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system affects the common area or an exclusive use common area to be area, or any successor to that member’s separate interest, to do any of the following:(1) Be responsible for the repair of any damage to the common area or an exclusive use common area, or to another member’s separate interest, that is caused by the installation, operation, maintenance, or removal of that cooling system. (2) (A) Engage a licensed contractor to install, maintain, and repair the cooling system.(B) This paragraph shall not apply when the installation, maintenance, or repair is for a portable air-conditioning unit, a window air-conditioning unit, an evaporative cooler, or any other cooling system that does not require a local building permit.(3) Disclose to prospective buyers of the separate interest the existence of the cooling system and related responsibilities of the owner under this section.(f) (1) An association that willfully violates this section shall be liable to the member for actual damages occasioned thereby, and shall pay a civil penalty to the member in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a member who prevails in a civil action to enforce the member’s rights pursuant to this section shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.